Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,200
State Fire Marshal; certify inspectors.

The State Fire Marshal may certify such qualified inspectors as may be necessary to carry out the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1811;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 36.